Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE I. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

For contingent expiration of this chapter, see Section 9021.003.

CHAPTER 9021. ROLLING V RANCH WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT NO. 1 OF WISE COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9021.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Rolling V Ranch Water Control and Improvement District No. 1 of Wise County.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 3991), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1347 (S.B. 2002), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 9021.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a water control and improvement district in Wise County created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, and Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 3991), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1347 (S.B. 2002), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 9021.003. CONFIRMATION ELECTION REQUIRED. If the creation of the district is not confirmed at a confirmation election held under Section 9021.024 before November 4, 2009:

(1) the district is dissolved November 4, 2009, except that the district shall:

(A) pay any debts incurred;

(B) transfer to Wise County any assets that remain after the payment of debts; and

(C) maintain the organization of the district until all debts are paid and remaining assets are transferred; and

(2) this chapter expires September 1, 2014.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 3991), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1347 (S.B. 2002), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 9021.004. INITIAL DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is initially composed of the territory described by Section 2 of the Act creating this chapter.

(b) The boundaries and field notes contained in Section 2 of the Act creating this chapter form a closure. A mistake made in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect:

(1) the organization, existence, or validity of the district;

(2) the right of the district to impose taxes;

(3) the validity of the district's bonds, notes, or indebtedness; or

(4) the legality or operation of the district or the board.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 3991), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1347 (S.B. 2002), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 9021.051. GOVERNING BODY; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 3991), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1347 (S.B. 2002), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 9021.101. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapters 49 and 51, Water Code, applicable to water control and improvement districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 3991), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1347 (S.B. 2002), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 9021.102. ROAD PROJECTS. To the extent authorized by Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, the district may construct, acquire, improve, maintain, or operate macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 3991), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1347 (S.B. 2002), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 9021.103. AUTHORITY TO CONTRACT WITH OWNERS OF REAL PROPERTY IN DISTRICT. The board may contract with an owner of real property in the district to construct, acquire, finance, own, maintain, or operate a work, project, service, or commodity necessary for a project authorized by Section 9021.101 or 9021.102.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 3991), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1347 (S.B. 2002), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 9021.104. DIVISION OF DISTRICT. (a) The district may be divided into two or more new districts only if the district:

(1) has no outstanding bonded debt; and

(2) is not imposing ad valorem taxes.

(b) This chapter applies to any new district created by the division of the district, and a new district has all the powers and duties of the district.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 932 (H.B. 4642), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

(d) Any new district created by the division of the district may not, at the time the new district is created, contain any land outside the area described by Section 2 of the Act creating this chapter.

(e) The board, on its own motion or on receipt of a petition signed by the owner or owners of a majority of the assessed value of the real property in the district, may adopt an order dividing the district.

(f) An order dividing the district must:

(1) name each new district;

(2) include the metes and bounds description of the territory of each new district;

(3) appoint temporary directors for each new district; and

(4) provide for the division of assets and liabilities between or among the new districts.

(g) On or before the 30th day after the date of adoption of an order dividing the district, the district shall file the order with the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality and record the order in the real property records of each county in which the district is located.

(h) Any new district created by the division of the district shall hold a confirmation and directors' election as required by Section 49.102, Water Code.

(i) If the creation of the new district is confirmed, the new district shall provide the election date and results to the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality.

(j) Any new district created by the division of the district must hold an election as required by this chapter to obtain voter approval before the district may impose a maintenance tax or issue bonds payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 3991), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1347 (S.B. 2002), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 932 (H.B. 4642), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 932 (H.B. 4642), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 9021.105. LAW ENFORCEMENT SERVICES. To protect the public interest, the district may contract with a qualified party, including a county or a municipality, to provide law enforcement services in the district for a fee.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 932 (H.B. 4642), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9021.151. TAX TO REPAY BONDS. The district may impose a tax to pay the principal of or interest on bonds or other obligations issued under Section 9021.201.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 3991), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1347 (S.B. 2002), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 9021.152. CONTRACT TAXES. In accordance with Section 49.108, Water Code, the district may impose a tax other than an operation and maintenance tax and use the revenue derived from the tax to make payments under a contract after the provisions of the contract have been approved by a majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 932 (H.B. 4642), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER E. BONDS

Sec. 9021.201. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. (a) The district may issue bonds or other obligations as provided by Chapters 49 and 51, Water Code, to finance the construction, maintenance, or operation of a project under Section 9021.101 or 9021.102.

(b) The district may not issue bonds or other obligations to finance projects authorized by Section 9021.102 unless the issuance is approved by a vote of a two-thirds majority of the district voters voting at an election called for that purpose.

(c) Bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance projects authorized by Section 9021.102 may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the district.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 3991), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1347 (S.B. 2002), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.